Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.107

Co-occurring disorder specialist enhancement—Contracted educational program—Telephonic consultation service. (Expires July 1, 2025.)

(1) Beginning July 1, 2020, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall contract with an educational program to offer the training developed under RCW 18.205.105. The contracted educational program shall offer the training at a reduced cost to health care providers identified in RCW 18.205.105. The training must be (a) available online on an ongoing basis and (b) offered in person at least four times per calendar year.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2020, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall contract with an entity to provide a telephonic consultation service to assist health care providers who have been issued a substance use disorder professional certification pursuant to RCW 18.205.090 or a co-occurring disorder specialist enhancement under RCW 18.205.105 with the diagnosis and treatment of patients with co-occurring behavioral health disorders.

(3) The department shall identify supervisors who are trained and available to supervise persons seeking to meet the supervised experience requirements established under RCW 18.205.105.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2025.

[ 2019 c 444 s 26.]